New York, session 2025-2026, S7308.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The executive law is amended by adding a new section 845-f 2 to read as follows: 3 § 845-f. Release of certain records of victims of police violence; law 4 enforcement agencies. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the 5 contrary, no police agency, prosecutorial agency and other law enforce- 6 ment agency with jurisdiction over an instance or occurrence in which a 7 police officer, as defined in subdivision thirty-four of section 1.20 of 8 the criminal procedure law, or a peace officer, as defined in section 9 2.10 of the criminal procedure law, employs the use of force shall 10 publicly release or otherwise disseminate any information, including but 11 not limited to providing such information to a news or media organiza- 12 tion, related to either the criminal history or any mental health histo- 13 ry of the individual who was the subject of the use of force. 14 § 2. This act shall take effect on the thirtieth day after it shall 15 have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD07471-01-5